District of Columbia statutes.
38-824.01

Physical activity goals.

(a)

It shall be the goal of the District of Columbia for children to engage in physical activity for 60 minutes each day.

(b)

Public schools and public charter schools shall promote this goal.

(c)

Public schools and public charter schools shall seek to maximize physical activity by means including:

(1)

Extending the school day;

(2)

Encouraging students to walk or bike to school;

(3)

Promoting active recess;

(4)

Including physical activity in after-school activities;

(5)

Supporting athletic programs; and

(6)

Integrating movement into classroom instruction.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 401, 57 DCR 4779

History